Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 19 Inspection of Dams and Reservoirs

46-19-1.
Periodical inspection required — Records and reports.

The director of the department of environmental management shall cause to be made a thorough inspection of every dam and reservoir in the state as often as may be necessary to keep himself or herself informed of the condition thereof; and shall make and keep a record of the result of the inspection, with whatever knowledge the director shall obtain in reference to each dam or reservoir, and shall make an annual report of his or her doings in his or her office in the month of January to the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-1

.

46-19-2.
Description and plans furnished by owner.

Every person owning, maintaining, or having control of any dam or reservoir shall, upon written request therefor, furnish to the director of the department of environmental management as full, true, and particular description of the dam or reservoir as may be practicable; and shall, as soon as may be after the request, cause to be made all the necessary surveys, plans, and drawings thereof as may be required by the director.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-2

.

46-19-3.
Approval of plans for construction or alteration.

No dam or reservoir shall be constructed or substantially altered until plans and specifications of the proposed work shall have been filed with and approved by the director.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 1902, ch. 991, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-3

.

46-19-4.
Investigations and orders as to unsafe dams and reservoirs.

The director of the department of environmental management, on application made to him or her in writing by any person owning or representing property liable to injury or destruction by the breaking of any dam or reservoir, or on an application made by any mayor or city council of any city, or by the town council of any town, on account of danger of loss of life or of injury to any highway or bridge therein, from the breaking of any dam or reservoir, or, without the complaint, whenever he or she shall have cause to apprehend that any dam or reservoir is unsafe, shall forthwith view and thoroughly examine the dam or reservoir, or cause the dam or reservoir to be viewed and examined. And if in the judgment of the director the dam or reservoir be not sufficiently strong to resist the pressure of water upon it, or if from any other cause the director shall determine the dam or reservoir to be unsafe, or if in his or her judgment there is reasonable cause to believe that danger to life or property may be apprehended from the unsafe dam or reservoir, the director shall determine whether the water in the reservoir shall be drawn off in whole or in part, and what alterations, additions, and repairs are necessary to be made to the dam or reservoir to make the dam or reservoir safe, and shall forthwith in writing under his or her hand notify the owner or person having control of the dam or reservoir to cause the additions, alterations, and repairs in the dam or reservoir to be made within a time to be limited in the notice; and may order the water in the reservoir to be drawn off, in whole or in part, as the director may determine.

If such order is not carried out within the time specified, or if the owner of the dam cannot be determined, the director of the department of environmental management or the director’s duly authorized agents may carry out the actions to mitigate the unsafe condition as required by the order, provided the director has determined that an emergency exists and the safety of life and/or property is endangered. The director is hereby authorized to assess the costs of such action, including the use of deed restrictions, against the person owning or having care and control of the dam.

Any order or notice issued by the director shall be eligible for recordation under chapter 13 of title 34. The director shall forward the order or notice to the city or town wherein the subject property is located and the order or notice shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city or town wherein the subject property is located. Upon satisfactory completion of the requirements of the order or notice, the director shall provide written notice of the same, which notice shall be similarly eligible for recordation. The written notice of satisfactory completion shall be forwarded to the city or town wherein the subject property is located and the notice of satisfactory completion shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city or town wherein the subject property is located.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-4

; P.L. 2006, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 175, § 1.

46-19-5.
Judicial enforcement of order to make dam or reservoir safe.

If the owner or person having the control of any dam or reservoir, who shall be required to draw off the water, or a portion of the water, in any reservoir, or to make alterations in any reservoir, or repairs thereon or additions thereto, in the manner prescribed in §

46-19-4

, shall not forthwith proceed to comply with the requirement, or shall not prosecute the work, when commenced, with reasonable expedition, the director of the department of environmental management shall make out a complaint in which he or she shall set forth the condition of the dam or reservoir, and the steps he or she has taken to cause the water to be drawn off therefrom and for the alteration or repair thereof, or to have additions made thereto to secure the safety of the dam or reservoir, and the default of the owner or person having control thereof in drawing off the water, repairing, altering, or in making an addition to the dam or reservoir, and that the safety of life and property is endangered by the default, and shall subscribe the default, and deliver the complaint to the attorney general or to an assistant attorney general, who shall present the complaint to the supreme court or the superior court, with a petition in the nature of an information ex officio, praying that the person owning or controlling the dam or reservoir may be required and ordered forthwith to comply with the requirements of the director of the department of environmental management theretofore made in the premises, or with such other orders as may be made by the court, to secure all persons having reasonable cause to apprehend injury to life or property from the unsafe condition of the dam or reservoir.

Upon the filing of the petition, a citation shall issue to the person controlling or owning the dam, commanding him or her to appear at a time and place therein named, to show cause, if any exists, why the relief prayed for shall not be granted; and the court shall summarily proceed to hear the cause, and upon hearing the parties, or by proceeding ex parte, if the respondent fails to appear, the court may pass such order and decree in the premises as will effectually secure the persons interested from danger or loss from the breaking of the dam or reservoir complained of; and the court may enforce the orders and decrees by injunction, process for contempt, by sequestration, or by such other process as may be applicable in those cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3632, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-5

; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 55.

46-19-6.
Access of agents to private property.

The director and the director’s duly authorized agents may, in the discharge of his or her or their duties, enter upon and pass over private property without rendering himself or herself or themselves liable in an action for trespass.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 9; P.L. 1902, ch. 991, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-6

.

46-19-7.
Employment of consulting engineer.

The director of the department of environmental management may employ a consulting engineer in any specific case in which the exigencies of the case may require it. The compensation of the consulting engineer shall be allowed by the director, and shall be paid upon the order of the state controller out of any money in the treasury appropriated therefor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-7

.

46-19-8.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary, to pay all necessary expenses incurred by the director of the department of environmental management in the discharge of the director’s duties; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders on the general treasurer from time to time for such sums as may be necessary, upon the presentation of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 124, § 8; P.L. 1902, ch. 991, § 2; P.L. 1906, ch. 1329, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 150, § 8; P.L. 1909, ch. 407, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 180, § 8; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 638, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-19-8

.

46-19-9.
Emergency action plans.

By July 1, 2008, an emergency action plan shall be prepared for each significant or high-hazard dam by the city or town wherein the dam lies. The Rhode Island emergency management agency, as established in chapter 15 of title 30, shall develop guidelines for the preparation of emergency action plans. The department of environmental management and the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns shall cooperate with the Rhode Island emergency management agency in developing the guidelines. All emergency action plans prepared pursuant to this section shall not be considered final or complete until approved by the emergency management agency, with the cooperation of the department of environmental management.

The owner of any other dam, regardless of the assigned hazard classification, may also be required to prepare an emergency action plan if deemed necessary by the department of environmental management.

Emergency action plans shall be updated on an annual basis and shall be filed with the Rhode Island emergency management agency, the department of environmental management, the chief of the local police department, and the local city or town emergency management official.

Once an emergency action plan is complete, the city or town wherein the dam lies shall provide written notice to the dam owner of the costs for actions taken by the city or town in the development of the emergency action plan. Said costs of developing the emergency action plan shall be remitted to the city or town within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the notice. In the event that the costs are not remitted within the ninety-day (90) period, the municipality shall have a valid legal claim against the dam owner, in the amount of such costs, plus any costs associated with the pursuit of the claim.

Each state agency shall, in cooperation with the municipality in which the dam lies, be responsible for the preparation of an emergency action plan for each high- and significant-hazard dam owned by that agency by the deadline specified in subsection (a).

The department of environmental management may assess an administrative penalty for failure to comply with subsections (a), (b), (c), and (e) of this section, in accordance with chapter 17.6 of title 42.

The department of environmental management and the Rhode Island emergency management agency shall establish a notification system for dams in the event of severe weather conditions to coordinate the actions at the federal, state, and local levels. The notification system shall include a dam advisory, a dam watch, and a dam warning.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 58, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 62, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 360, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 361, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.